Wyoming, session 2025, HB0258.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Appropriation" means the authorizations granted by
the legislature under this act to make expenditures from and to
incur obligations against the general fund and other funds as
specified;
HB0258

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0556

(ii) "FF" means federal funds;

(iii) "PR" means private funding sources;

(iv) "SR" means an agency's account within the special
revenue fund;

(v) "S0" means other funds identified by footnote;

(vi) "S13" means the strategic investments and projects
account.

(b) Appropriations for projects in this act remain in effect
until the project is completed, unless otherwise provided. The
amounts appropriated for projects under this act shall be expended
only on the projects specified and any unexpended, unobligated
funds remaining upon completion of a project shall revert to the
accounts from which they were appropriated, unless otherwise
provided. The amounts appropriated in this act are intended to
provide a maximum amount for each project from any source
excluding contingency funding and shall not be construed to be an
entitlement or guaranteed amount.
HB0258

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0556

(c) When used in a footnote in this act, "this
appropriation" shall be construed as a reference to that portion
of the appropriated funds identified in the footnote.

[CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION]

Section 2.

(a) The following sums of money are appropriated for the
capital construction projects specified:

(i) Appropriations and authorization for projects
administered through the state construction department:

HB0258

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0556
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 027. CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS

PROGRAM
SCD - Enterprise Lvl I & Lvl II 712,000 S13 712,000
SBC - Contingency Fund 3,970,573 S13 3,970,573
AG - Evo Complex 1. 4,316,344 S13 4,316,344
AG - Firearm Ranges 1. 36,605,151 S13 36,605,151
DOH - VH Remodel 2. 79,000,000 S13 79,000,000
CWC - Indust. Fac. Reno. 3,854,764 PR 3,854,764
LCCC - Auto Tech. Reno. 2,092,370 PR
2,594,539 S13 4,686,909
LCCC - Science Ctr. Reno. 3,345,904 PR
4,148,920 S13 7,494,824
LCCC - Crossroads Bldg. Reno. 3,270,608 PR
4,055,553 S13 7,326,161
LCCC - Comm. Ctr. Reno. 3,178,724 PR
3,941,617 S13 7,120,341
NWCCD - Science Bldg. Reno. 9,964,583 PR 9,964,583
DOC - Sec. System Integr. 18,000,000 S13 18,000,000
DOC - HVAC 8,427,000 S13 8,427,000

TOTALS 0 0 191,478,650 191,478,650

1. The state construction department is authorized to expend a portion of
these appropriations as necessary to fund one (1) existing at-will employee
HB0258

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0556
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
contract position for the duration of these projects for the purposes of
administrating and managing design and construction activities.

2. The state construction department is authorized to expend a portion of this
appropriation as necessary to fund one (1) existing at-will employee contract
position for the duration of this project, for the purposes of administrating
and managing design and construction activities.

[TRANSFER OF FUNDS]

Section 3. The state auditor shall transfer one hundred
fifty-four million three hundred three thousand four hundred four
dollars ($154,303,404.00) from the legislative stabilization
reserve account to the strategic investments and projects account.
HB0258

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0556

[EFFECTIVE DATE]

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0258